California statutes. Insurance Code
-------------------------------------------

12855.

The commissioner may adopt regulations necessary or desirable to implement this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 439, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Operative July 1, 2004, by Sec. 7 of Ch. 439.)
-------------------------------------------

12860.

The provisions of this part are severable. If any provision of this part or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 439, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Operative July 1, 2004, by Sec. 7 of Ch. 439.)
-------------------------------------------

12865.

A promise to refund some or all of the purchase price of a service contract if the purchaser does not file any claims, files a limited number of claims, or files claims the dollar amount of which does not exceed a set amount or percentage, shall constitute insurance, unless subdivisions (a) and (b) are satisfied. If conditions (a) and (b) are satisfied, the promise shall constitute a refund agreement.

(a) The promise is offered without separate consideration, and the promisor complies with subdivisions (a)(1), (a)(2) or (a)(3).

(1) The promisor is a service contract obligor, the promise is contained within a service contract, and the obligor has complied with all provisions of this part.

(2) The promisor is a seller, the refund agreement provides no benefits other than the refund of some or all of the purchase price, and the promisor utilizes a refund agreement administrator.

(3) The promisor is neither a seller nor a service contract obligor. Such a person shall be deemed a refund agreement obligor, and shall comply with subdivisions (c)(1), (c)(2) and (c)(3).

(b) A person other than the seller who performs or arranges, directly or indirectly, the collection, maintenance, or disbursement of moneys to compensate any party under a refund agreement, and who also provides sellers with refund agreement forms and participates in the adjustment of refund agreement claims, shall be deemed a refund agreement administrator, and shall comply with subdivision (b)(2).

(1) The sections enumerated in subdivision (b)(2) shall apply to refund agreements and refund agreement administrators. In applying those sections, the terms vehicle service contract administrator, administrator and obligor shall instead mean refund agreement administrator, the word sold shall instead mean provided and the terms vehicle service contract and service contract shall instead mean refund agreement. The sections enumerated in subdivision (b)(2) shall be construed in accordance with the nature of refund agreement forms, refund agreement administrators, and the refund agreement business.

(2) The following sections shall apply and be interpreted pursuant to subdivision (b)(1): 12815(b); 12820(a), (b)(1), (b)(2), (b)(3)(A), (b)(3)(B), 12830(a), (a)(1), (a)(2), (b), (c), (d), (e); 12835; 12840; 12845; 12850; 12855.

(c) (1) The sections enumerated in subdivision (c)(2) shall apply to refund agreements and refund agreement obligors. In applying those sections, the terms vehicle service contract obligor and obligor shall instead mean refund agreement obligor, the word sold shall instead mean provided and the terms vehicle service contract and service contract shall instead mean refund agreement. The sections enumerated in subdivision (c)(2) shall be construed in accordance with the nature of refund agreement forms, refund agreement obligors, and the refund agreement business.

(2) The following sections shall apply and be interpreted pursuant to subdivision (c)(1): 12810(b); 12815(a); 12820(a), (b)(1), (b)(2), (3)(A), (3)(B); 12830(a), (a)(1), (a)(2), (b), (c), (d), (e); 12835; 12840; 12845; 12850; 12855.

(3) A refund agreement obligor may not promise any benefit other than a refund of some or all of the purchase price of a service contract if the purchaser does not file any claims, files a limited number of claims, or files claims the dollar amount of which does not exceed a set amount or percentage.

(4) No person other than a seller shall provide or offer to provide a refund agreement to a purchaser.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 439, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Operative July 1, 2004, by Sec. 7 of Ch. 439.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 9. Pet Insurance [12880. - 12880.8.]

12880.

For purposes of this part, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Chronic condition” means a condition that can be treated or managed, but not cured.

(b) “Congenital anomaly or disorder” means a condition that is present from birth, whether inherited or caused by the environment, which may cause or otherwise contribute to illness or disease.

(c) “Hereditary disorder” means an abnormality that is genetically transmitted from parent to offspring and may cause illness or disease.

(d) “Orthopedic” refers to conditions
 affecting the bones, skeletal muscle, cartilage, tendons, ligaments, and joints, including elbow dysplasia, hip dysplasia, intervertebral disc degeneration, patellar luxation, and ruptured cranial cruciate ligaments. “Orthopedic” does not include cancers or metabolic, hemopoietic, or autoimmune diseases.

(e) “Pet insurance” means an individual or group property insurance policy that provides coverage for accidents and illnesses of pets, and other veterinary expenses.

(f) “Preexisting condition” means any condition for which a veterinarian provided medical advice, the pet received treatment for, or the pet displayed signs or symptoms consistent with the stated condition prior to the effective date of a pet insurance policy or during any waiting period.

(g) “Producer” means a person licensed pursuant to Section 1625 or 1625.5 who transacts pet insurance in California.

(h) “Renewal” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 660.

(i) “Veterinarian” means an individual who holds a valid license to practice veterinary medicine from the Veterinary Medical Board pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 4800) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code or other appropriate licensing entity in the jurisdiction in which the individual practices.

(j) “Veterinary dental care” means the prevention, diagnosis, and treatment of conditions, diseases, and disorders of the oral cavity,
 the maxillofacial region, and associated structures.

(k) “Veterinary expenses” means the costs associated with medical advice, diagnosis, care, or treatment provided by a veterinarian, including, but not limited to, veterinary dental care, the cost of drugs prescribed by a veterinarian, and services provided under the supervision of a veterinarian.

(l) “Waiting period” means the period of time specified in a pet insurance policy that is required to transpire before some or all of the coverage in the policy can begin.

(m) “Wellness program” means a subscription or reimbursement-based program that is separate from an insurance policy and that provides goods and services to promote the general health, safety, or well-being of
 the pet.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 612, Sec. 1.   (SB 1217)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

12880.1.

A policy of pet insurance that is marketed, issued, amended, renewed, or delivered, whether or not in California, to a California resident, on or after July 1, 2015, regardless of the situs of the contract or master group policyholder, or the jurisdiction in which the contract was issued or delivered, is subject to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 896, Sec. 1.   (AB 2056)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

12880.2.

(a) An insurer transacting pet insurance in California shall disclose all of the following to consumers:

(1) If the policy excludes coverage due to any of the following:

(A) A preexisting condition.

(B) A hereditary disorder.

(C) A congenital anomaly or disorder.

(D) A chronic condition.

(2) If the policy includes any other exclusion, the following statement: “Other exclusions may
 apply. Please refer to the exclusions section of the policy for more information.”

(3) Any policy provision that limits coverage through a waiting period, a deductible, coinsurance, or an annual or lifetime policy limit.

(4) Whether the insurer reduces coverage or increases premiums based on the insured’s claim history, the age of the covered pet, or a change in the geographic location of the insured.

(b) (1) If a pet insurer uses any of the terms in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) in a policy of pet insurance, the insurer shall use the definition of those terms as set forth in Section 12880 and include the definitions of the terms in the policy. The pet insurer shall also make those
 definitions available before the sale of a policy, through a link on the main page of the insurer’s internet website, or as a hard copy if hard copy policy documents are requested by or provided to a consumer.

(2) This subdivision and Section 12880 do not prohibit or limit the types of exclusions pet insurers may use in their policies. This subdivision does not require pet insurers to have any of the limitations or exclusions defined in Section 12880.

(c) Before the sale of a policy, a pet insurer shall clearly disclose a summary description of the basis or formula on which the insurer determines claim payments under a pet insurance policy within the policy and through a link on the main page of the insurer’s internet website, or as a hard copy if hard copy policy documents are
 requested by or provided to a consumer.

(d) A pet insurer that uses a benefit schedule to determine claim payment under a pet insurance policy shall do both of the following before the sale of a policy:

(1) Clearly disclose the applicable benefit schedule in the policy.

(2) Disclose all benefit schedules used by the insurer under its pet insurance policies through a link on the main page of the insurer’s internet website, or as a hard copy if hard copy policy documents are requested by or provided to a consumer.

(e) A pet insurer that determines claim payments under a pet insurance policy based on usual and customary fees, or any other reimbursement limitation based
 on prevailing veterinary service provider charges, shall do both of the following before the sale of a policy:

(1) Include a usual and customary fee limitation provision in the policy that clearly describes the insurer’s basis for determining usual and customary fees and how that basis is applied in calculating claim payments.

(2) Disclose the insurer’s basis for determining usual and customary fees through a link on the main page of the insurer’s
 internet website, or as a hard copy if hard copy policy documents are requested by or provided to a consumer.

(f) If a medical examination by a licensed veterinarian is required to effectuate coverage, the pet insurer shall clearly and conspicuously disclose the required aspects of the examination before a policy purchase and disclose that examination documentation may result in a preexisting condition exclusion before the sale of a policy.

(g) Waiting periods and the requirements applicable to waiting periods shall be clearly and prominently disclosed to consumers before a policy purchase.

(h) The insurer shall create a summary of all policy provisions required in subdivisions (a) to (g), inclusive, and
 subdivision (j) into a separate document titled “Insurer Disclosure of Important Policy Provisions.”

(i) The insurer shall post the “Insurer Disclosure of Important Policy Provisions” document required in subdivision (h) through a link on the main page of the insurer’s internet website, or as a hard copy if hard copy policy documents are requested by or provided to a consumer.

(j) (1) In connection with the issuance of a new pet insurance policy, the insurer shall provide the insured with a copy of the “Insurer Disclosure of Important Policy Provisions” document required pursuant to subdivision (h) in at least 12-point type when it delivers the policy.

(2) In addition, the pet insurance policy
 shall have clearly printed thereon or attached thereto a notice stating that, after receipt of the policy by the owner, the policy may be returned by the insured for cancellation by delivering it or mailing it to the insurer or to the agent through whom it was purchased.

(A) The period of time set forth by the insurer for return of the policy shall be clearly stated on the notice, and this free look period shall be not less than 30 days. The insured may return the policy to the insurer or the agent through whom the policy was purchased at any time during the free look period specified in the notice.

(B) The delivery or mailing of the policy by the insured pursuant to this paragraph shall void the policy from the beginning, and the parties shall be in the same position as if a policy or
 contract had not been issued.

(C) All premiums paid and any policy fee paid for the policy shall be refunded to the insured within 30 days from the date that the insurer is notified of the cancellation. However, if the insurer has paid any claim, or has advised the insured in writing that a claim will be paid, the 30-day free look right pursuant to this paragraph is inapplicable and instead the policy provisions relating to cancellation apply to any refund.

(k) The disclosures required in this section shall be in addition to any other disclosure requirements required by law or regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 612, Sec. 2.   (SB 1217)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

12880.3.

(a) A person who violates a provision of this part is liable to the state for a civil penalty to be determined by the commissioner, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation, or, if the violation was willful, a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation. The commissioner may establish the acts that constitute a distinct violation for purposes of this section. However, when the issuance, amendment, or servicing of a policy or endorsement is inadvertent, all of those acts constitute a single violation for purposes of this section.

(b) The penalty imposed by this section shall be imposed by and determined by
 the commissioner pursuant to Section 12880.4. The penalty imposed by this section is appealable by means of any remedy provided by Section 12940 or by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 896, Sec. 1.   (AB 2056)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

12880.4.

(a) Whenever the commissioner shall have reason to believe that a person has engaged or is engaging in this state in a violation of this part, and that a proceeding by the commissioner in respect thereto would be to the interest of the public, he or she shall issue and serve upon that person an order to show cause containing a statement of the charges in that respect, a statement of that person’s potential liability under this part, and a notice of a hearing thereon to be held at a time and place fixed therein, which shall not be less than 30 days after the service thereof, for the purpose of determining whether the commissioner should issue an order to that person to pay the penalty imposed by Section 12880.3 and to cease and desist those methods, acts, or practices, or any of them,
 that violate this part.

(b) If the charges or any of them are found to be justified, the commissioner shall issue and cause to be served upon that person an order requiring that person to pay the penalty imposed by Section 12880.3 and to cease and desist from engaging in those methods, acts, or practices found to be in violation of this part.

(c) The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except that the hearings may be conducted by an administrative law judge in the administrative law bureau when the proceedings involve a common question of law or fact with another proceeding arising under other Insurance Code sections that may be conducted by administrative law bureau administrative law judges. The commissioner and the appointed
 administrative law judge shall have all the powers granted under the Administrative Procedure Act.

(d) The person is entitled to have the proceedings and the order reviewed by means of any remedy provided by Section 12940 or by the Administrative Procedure Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 374.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12880.5.

The commissioner may adopt reasonable rules and regulations, as are necessary to administer this part, in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 896, Sec. 1.   (AB 2056)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

12880.6.

At the time a pet insurance policy is issued or delivered to a policyholder, the insurer shall include a written disclosure with all of the following information, printed in 12-point boldface type:

(a) The department’s mailing address, toll-free telephone number established pursuant to Section 12921.1, and internet website
 address.

(b) The address and customer service telephone number of the insurer or the agent or broker of record.

(c) A statement that the department should be contacted only after discussions with the insurer, or its agent or other representative, have failed to produce a satisfactory resolution of the problem.

(d) If the policy was issued or delivered by an agent or broker, a statement advising the policyholder to contact the broker or agent for assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 166, Sec. 1.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

12880.7.

(a) After disclosure to the consumer, a pet insurer may issue policies that exclude coverage on the basis of one or more preexisting conditions. A condition for which coverage is afforded on a policy shall not be considered a preexisting condition on a renewal of the policy. The pet insurer has the burden of proving that the preexisting condition exclusion applies to the condition for which a claim is being made.

(b) After disclosure to the consumer, a pet insurer may issue policies that impose waiting periods upon commencement of coverage that do not exceed 30 days for illnesses or orthopedic conditions not resulting from an accident. A pet insurance policy shall
 not impose a waiting period for accidents.

(1) A pet insurer utilizing a waiting period shall include a provision in its contract that allows the waiting period to be waived upon completion of a medical examination. A pet insurer may require the examination to be conducted by a licensed veterinarian after the purchase of the policy.

(2) (A) A medical examination conducted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be paid for by the policyholder, unless the policy specifies that the pet insurer will pay for the examination.

(B) A pet insurer may specify elements to be included as part of the medical examination conducted pursuant to paragraph (1) and may require documentation of those elements, if those specifications
 do not unreasonably restrict an insured’s ability to waive the waiting period.

(3) Waiting periods, and the requirements applicable to the waiting periods, shall be clearly and prominently disclosed to consumers before the policy purchase.

(4) (A) Upon receipt of a complete application for coverage and valid payment information, a pet insurer shall issue coverage to be effective no later than 12:01 a.m. on the second consecutive day.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A):

(i) A pet insurer may elect to conduct individualized underwriting on a specific pet, in which case coverage shall be effective no later than 12:01 a.m. on the next day after the pet insurer has determined the pet is eligible for coverage.

(ii) If pet insurance coverage is acquired by an individual through an employer or organization, the effective date of the pet insurance coverage may be postponed to align with the eligibility requirements, benefits effective date, or payment transmission date chosen by the employer or organization.

(C) The date and time at which
 coverage becomes effective shall be prominently disclosed to the consumer.

(D) For purposes of this paragraph, “individualized underwriting” may include examinations, tests, and any other diagnostic measures that the pet insurer may require, but shall not include any waiting or deferral periods.

(c) A waiting period shall not be applied to a renewal of existing coverage.

(d) A pet insurer shall not require a veterinary examination of the covered pet as a condition of policy renewal.

(e) If a pet insurer includes any prescriptive, wellness, or noninsurance benefits in the policy form, then those benefits are made part of the policy contract and shall comply with all
 applicable laws and regulations for insurance policies.

(f) A consumer’s eligibility to purchase a pet insurance policy shall not be based on participation, or lack of participation, in a separate wellness program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 612, Sec. 3.   (SB 1217)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

12880.8.

(a) A pet insurer or producer shall not market a wellness program as pet insurance. Marketing materials for pet insurance shall be separate from marketing materials for wellness programs.

(b) If a wellness program is sold by a pet insurer or producer, all of the following shall apply:

(1) The seller shall clearly and conspicuously disclose during the sales process that the wellness program is not a regulated insurance product and that a pet owner may purchase pet insurance without having to purchase a wellness program.

(2) The purchase or
 renewal of the wellness program shall not be a requirement to the purchase or renewal of pet insurance.

(3) The costs of the wellness program shall be separate and identifiable from a pet insurance policy sold by the pet insurer or producer.

(4) A payment transaction for pet insurance shall be separate from a payment transaction for a wellness program.

(5) The terms and conditions for a wellness program shall be separate from the terms and conditions of a pet insurance policy sold by the pet insurer or producer.

(6) Documents and correspondence provided to a consumer regarding a wellness program
 shall clearly identify the entity providing the wellness program.

(7) The products or coverages available through the wellness program shall not duplicate products or coverages available through the pet insurance policy.

(8) The advertising of the wellness program shall
 not be misleading or false and shall comply with this section.

(c) Coverages included in the pet insurance policy contract described as “wellness” benefits are insurance.

(d) (1) A wellness program sold by an insurer shall be deemed to be insurance.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a wellness program sold by an insurer shall not be deemed to be insurance if all of the following are true:

(A) The wellness program services are provided by an entity other than an insurer.

(B) The wellness program is marketed under the name of the entity providing wellness program
 services.

(C) The wellness program does not constitute insurance pursuant to subdivision (e).

(e) If a wellness program undertakes to indemnify a person against loss, damage, or liability arising from a contingent or unknown event, it is transacting insurance and is subject to this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   (SB 1217)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 3. THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER [12900. - 13855.]



CHAPTER 1. Appointment, Qualification, and Offices [12900. - 12907.]

12900.

(a) The commissioner shall be elected by the people in the same time, place, and manner as the Governor not to exceed two four-year terms.

(b) Should a vacancy occur during the term of office, legislative confirmation shall be required for the position of commissioner in the same manner and procedure as that required by Section 5 of Article V of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1227, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 1988, by initiative Prop. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

12901.

The commissioner shall be a person competent and fully qualified to perform the duties of the office. Neither the commissioner nor any deputy or employee shall during the commissioner’s, deputy’s, or employee’s tenure of office be an officer, agent, or employee of an insurer or directly or indirectly interested in any insurer or licensee under this code, except (a) as a policyholder or (b) by virtue of relationship by blood or marriage to any person interested in any insurer or licensee.

If the commissioner or any deputy or employee holds any license or permit issued under this code, that commissioner, deputy, or employee shall surrender it for cancellation within 10 days after appointment and qualification. Upon termination of the commissioner’s, deputy’s, or
 employee’s office or employment, that license or permit shall be reissued for the balance of the then current license or permit year without fee or penalty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 50, Sec. 240.   (AB 378)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12902.

The annual salary of the commissioner is provided for by Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1613.)
-------------------------------------------

12903.

The commissioner may employ actuarial, technical, and administrative assistants and clerks, as the commissioner may need to discharge in proper manner the duties imposed upon the commissioner by law. The commissioner may also employ stenographic reporters to take and transcribe the testimony in any formal hearing or investigation before the commissioner, deputy, or person authorized by the commissioner.

Those employed persons shall perform the duties assigned to them by the commissioner, subject to the provisions of the civil service laws. The commissioner may incur traveling and other expenses as are necessary, convenient, or advisable for the performance of the commissioner’s duties. The provisions of this section shall not be deemed to affect or modify positions or
 seniority of officers or employees existing and held in the office of the commissioner immediately prior to the date this section takes effect, and all persons then serving in any capacity therein shall continue and remain in that capacity without change of position or seniority, subject to the provisions of the law regulating civil service in the same manner and to the same extent as prior to the date this section takes effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 50, Sec. 241.   (AB 378)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12903.1.

(a) The commissioner may not accept, use, or in any manner benefit from payments or reimbursements made to the department for travel from any of the following:

(1) A single source that is subject to regulation by the commissioner.

(2) A private attorney or law firm that is under contract or is bidding on or under consideration for a contract to represent either the department or the commissioner in the commissioner’s official capacity.

(3) A private attorney or law firm that seeks to be awarded, or has been awarded, advocacy fees under subdivision (b) of Section 1861.10.

(4) A private attorney or law firm that has a client subject to regulation by the commissioner.

(b) For purposes of this section, any payment or reimbursement provided by a representative of a person or entity subject to regulation by the commissioner shall be deemed to be provided by the regulated person or entity.

(c) (1) The Attorney General or any other person within this state may bring a civil action for the violation of this section. The court may assess a civil penalty in the amount of three times the amount of the unlawful benefit or payment received by the commissioner.

(2) An action under this subdivision shall be filed within five years of the date on which the violation occurred. If the commissioner engages in fraudulent
 concealment, the five-year period shall be tolled for the period of the concealment. For the purposes of this paragraph, “fraudulent concealment” means the commissioner knowingly concealed facts related to the commissioner’s travel expenditures or reimbursements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 50, Sec. 242.   (AB 378)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12903.5.

On the recommendation of the commissioner the Personnel Board may establish rates of compensation for insurance examiners engaged in examinations out of this State which are in excess of the rates based on the regular monthly salary ranges established for such examiners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 173.)
-------------------------------------------

12904.

In the administration of the provisions of this code and other insurance laws, the commissioner may purchase reports of financial and character reporting services, and other books and reports as in the commissioner’s opinion will aid in administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 50, Sec. 243.   (AB 378)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12905.

The commissioner shall maintain offices in Sacramento, Los Angeles, San Diego, and the San Francisco Bay area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 37, Sec. 44.   (AB 1817)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12906.

The governmental agency unit heretofore known as the Department of Insurance in the Business, Transportation and Housing Agency is hereby made an independent department. The Department of Insurance is under the control of the Insurance Commissioner. The removal from the Business, Transportation and Housing Agency of the Department of Insurance, effected by this section, shall not affect in any manner the deputies or employees of such governmental agency unit, except as otherwise provided by the act enacted in the 1990 portion of the 1989–90 Regular Session that amended this section, and, except as so provided, their employments and positions are hereby expressly continued in existence. The Insurance Commissioner is not a head of a department within the meaning of Sections 1061 and 11151 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1239, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

12907.

The following existing positions in the Department of Insurance shall be appointed by the Governor and are exempt from the state civil service system:

(a) Chief executive officer.

(b) Deputy commissioner for the office of the ombudsman.

(c) Career executive assignment IV, in the administration and licensing services division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1124, Sec. 38.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Powers and Duties [12919. - 13555.]



  ARTICLE 1. Generally [12919. - 12938.]

12919.

Communications to the commissioner or any person in the commissioner’s office in respect to any fact concerning the holder of, or applicant for, any certificate or license issued under this code are made to the commissioner in official confidence within the meaning of Sections 1040 and 1041 of the Evidence Code. Liability shall not exist and no action or proceeding shall lie for or on account of any communication or the making thereof, but the existence of the communication shall not be deemed to dispense with or nullify any requirement of notice, hearing, or production of evidence before the commissioner as otherwise required by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 50, Sec. 244.   (AB 378)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12920.

The commissioner shall determine the sufficiency and validity of all securities required to be given by persons engaged, or to be engaged, in insurance business, and shall cause such security to be supplemented or renewed in case of the insufficiency or invalidity thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12920.5.

In addition to and independent of any and all other proper causes for refusal by the commissioner to approve or accept any bond filed or presented for filing with the commissioner under any provision of this code or other laws, the commissioner shall decline to approve, accept, or file any bond, if, in the commissioner’s opinion, the principal and the surety are affiliated in any manner whereby insolvency of the one party would affect the solvency of the other or whereby it is made uncertain whether or not that result might occur.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 50, Sec. 245.   (AB 378)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12921.

(a) The commissioner shall perform all duties imposed upon the commissioner by the provisions of this code and other laws regulating the business of insurance in this state, and shall enforce the execution of those provisions and laws.

(b) In an administrative action to enforce the provisions of this code and other laws regulating the business of insurance in this state, any settlement is subject to all of the following:

(1) The commissioner may delegate the power to negotiate the terms and conditions of a settlement to designated deputy commissioners. The commissioner may delegate the power to approve a settlement, unless the settlement involves any of the following:

(A) An insurer.

(B) A managing general agent or production agent that manages the business of an insurer.

(C) A title company.

(D) A home protection company.

(E) An insurance adjuster whose claims practices are at issue.

(F) An insurance agent or broker, or an applicant for an insurance agent or broker license, who has allegedly engaged in theft, fraud, or the misappropriation of premium or other funds in an amount that exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(2) Unless specifically provided for in a provision of this code, the commissioner may not agree to any
 of the following:

(A) That the respondent contribute, deposit, or transfer any moneys or other resources to a nonprofit entity.

(B) That a respondent contribute, deposit, or transfer any fine, penalty, assessment, cost, or fee except to the commissioner for deposit in the appropriate state fund pursuant to Section 12975.7.

(C) That the commissioner may or shall direct the transfer, distribution, or payment to another person or entity of any fine, penalty, assessment, cost, or fee.

(D) The use of the commissioner’s name, likeness, or voice in any printed material or audio or visual medium, either for general distribution or for distribution to specific recipients.

(3) The commissioner may
 only agree to payment to those persons or entities to whom payment may be due because of the respondent’s violation of a provision of this code or other law regulating the business of insurance in this state.

(4) A settlement may only include the sanctions provided by this code or other laws regulating the business of insurance in this state, except that the settlement may include attorney’s fees, costs of the department in bringing the enforcement action, and future costs of the department to ensure compliance with the settlement agreement.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the commissioner may accept documents submitted for filing or approval, process transactions, and maintain records in electronic form or as paper documents, and may adopt regulations to further this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 50, Sec. 246.   (AB 378)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12921.1.

(a) The commissioner shall establish a program on or before July 1, 1991, to investigate complaints and respond to inquiries received pursuant to Section 12921.3, to comply with Section 12921.4, and, when warranted, to bring enforcement actions against insurers or production agencies, as those terms are defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1748.5. The program shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) A toll-free telephone number published in telephone books throughout the state, dedicated to the handling of complaints and inquiries.

(2) Public service announcements to
 inform consumers of the toll-free telephone number and how to register a complaint or make an inquiry to the department.

(3) A simple, standardized complaint form designed to assure that complaints will be properly registered and tracked.

(4) Retention of records on complaints for at least three years after the complaint has been closed.

(5) Guidelines to disseminate complaint and enforcement information on individual insurers to the public, that shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) License status.

(B) Number and type of complaints closed within the last full calendar year,
 with analogous statistics from the prior two years for comparison. The proportion of those complaints determined by the department to require that corrective action be taken against the insurer, or leading to insurer compromise, or other remedy for the complainant, as compared to those that are found to be without merit. This information shall be disseminated in a fashion that will facilitate identification of meritless complaints and discourage their consideration by consumers and others interested in the records of insurers.

(C) Number and type of violations found, by reference to the line of insurance and the law violated. For the purposes of this subparagraph, the department shall separately report this information for health insurers.

(D) Number and type of enforcement
 actions taken.

(E) Ratio of complaints received to total policies in force, or premium dollars paid in a given line, or both. Private passenger automobile insurance ratios shall be calculated as the number of
 complaints received to total car years earned in the period studied.

(F) Any other information the department deems is appropriate public information regarding the complaint record of the insurer that will assist the public in selecting an insurer. However, nothing in this section shall be construed to permit disclosure of information or documents in the possession of the department to the extent that the information and those documents are protected from disclosure under any other provision of law.

(6) Procedures and average processing times for each step of complaint mediation, investigation, and enforcement. These procedures shall be consistent with those in Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 790) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 for complaints within the